Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1927
Foreclosure of tax lien by county under old law; resale by county board.

Where any county shall have acquired real estate, under the conditions set forth in any one or more of sections 77-1923 to 77-1925, the county board shall have power to convey any of such real estate, by a deed signed by the chairman of the county board at any time after May 26, 1943, subject to the right, if any, of any person, persons, firm or corporation or governmental body to attack the same by action or proceeding within the one-year limitation herein provided for, for such price as the county board, in the exercise of good faith, shall determine to be a fair and reasonable price for the property.

Laws 1943, c. 184, § 5, p. 633;

R.S.1943, § 77-1927.